Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 37 Radiologic Technologist Licensing

Cross references. —

As to licensing generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

Stated

in

Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987).

§ 33-37-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Allied health professional” is a person certified or licensed in one (1) of the following fields: dental hygiene, dietary, medical technology, respiratory therapy, physical therapy or hospital administration;

“Board” means the board of radiologic technologist examiners;

“License” means a legal authorization to apply ionizing radiation to persons;

“Licensed practitioner” means a person licensed or otherwise authorized by law to practice medicine, dentistry, podiatry, osteopathy or chiropractic and includes properly certified physician assistants and properly licensed advanced practice nurses as defined under W.S. 33-21-120(a)(i);

“Radiation” means ionizing radiation including gamma rays and x-rays, alpha particles, beta particles, electrons, neutrons, protons and other nuclear particles but not sound or radio waves or visible, infrared or ultraviolet light;

“Radiologic technologist” means a person other than a licensed practitioner who applies ionizing radiation or radiopharmaceutical agents to humans for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes;

“Restricted license” means an authorization which may be granted by the board to apply ionizing radiation to humans when an applicant’s qualifications do not meet standards required for issuance of a license. Persons receiving a restricted license shall be designated as radiologic technicians;

“This act” means W.S.

33-37-101

through

33-37-113

.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 206, § 1; 1993, ch. 103, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-37-102.
Acceptable practices.

A licensed radiologic technologist may apply radiation to persons for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes under specific direction of a person licensed to prescribe the examinations or treatment.

A licensed radiologic technician may select technique, position patients, critique films and apply radiation to persons for diagnostic purposes under specific direction of a person licensed to prescribe the examinations. Restricted licenses shall state the procedures the radiologic technician may perform which shall not include more than three (3) body areas.

A license is not required for a student attending a school or college of medicine, osteopathy, podiatry, dentistry, dental hygiene, chiropractic or radiologic technology, who applies radiation to persons under the direct supervision of a person licensed to prescribe the examinations or treatments.

This act does not apply to:

Licensed practitioners as defined in W.S. 33-37-101(a)(iv);

Allied dental health professionals and dental assistants solely because they expose radiographs for dental diagnosis; and

Persons employed by or assisting licensed podiatrists and receiving education and training pursuant to W.S.

33-9-114

.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 206, § 1; 1986, ch. 13, § 1; 1988, ch. 20, § 1; 1993, ch. 103, § 1; 1995, ch. 156, § 2; 2004, ch. 51, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (d)(i), substituted “as defined in W.S. 33-37-101(a)(iv)” for “and properly certified physician assistants and properly licensed advanced practice nurses qualifying under rules and regulations of the state board of nursing.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-37-101(a)(viii).

§ 33-37-103.
Board of radiologic technologists examiners; composition; terms; removal.

The board of radiologic technologists examiners is created. The board shall consist of five (5) members who are citizens of the United States and residents of Wyoming appointed by the governor. Three (3) members shall be radiologic technologists who are registered or who possess suitable equivalent qualifications, one (1) member shall be a person licensed or otherwise authorized by law to practice medicine specialized in radiology and one (1) member shall be from the general public. Vacancies in unexpired terms shall be filled by the governor for the remainder of the term. The governor may remove any board member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The terms for each member are:

Three (3) radiologic technologists for two (2) years;

One (1) person licensed or otherwise authorized to practice medicine in radiology for three (3) years;

One (1) general public member for two (2) years.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 206, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 2004, ch. 51, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), substituted “five (5) members” for “three (3) members,” “Three (3) members” for “One (1) member,” and “person licensed or otherwise authorized by law to practice medicine specialized” for “a licensed practitioner”; rewrote (b)(i) formerly under which one technologist served for one year; in (b)(ii) substituted “person licensed or otherwise authorized to practice medicine” for “licensed practitioner”; and made stylistic changes throughout.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 51, § 2, provides: “Notwithstanding W.S. 33-37-103(b)(i), one (1) of the additional radiologic technologists appointed to the board of radiologic technologists under this act shall be appointed for an initial term of three (3) years. Thereafter all terms under W.S. 33-37-103(b)(i) shall be for two (2) year terms.”

§ 33-37-104.
Meetings; quorum.

The board shall meet quarterly and elect a chairman at the first meeting of each year. Three (3) board members constitute a quorum.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 206, § 1; 2004, ch. 51, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, substituted “Three (3) board members” for “Two (2) board members.”

§ 33-37-105.
Rules.

The board shall adopt rules to carry out this act.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 206, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-37-101(a)(viii).

§ 33-37-106.
Applicants; qualifications.

The board shall grant a license to an applicant who is at least eighteen (18) years of age and who has completed a course of study in radiologic technology approved by the board and provides satisfactory evidence to the board of fitness to perform duties of a radiologic technologist.

The board shall grant a restricted license to an applicant who is at least eighteen (18) years of age and is capable of performing as a radiologic technician.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 206, § 1; 2004, ch. 51, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), substituted “and provides satisfactory evidence to the board of fitness to perform duties of a radiologic technologist” for “or has otherwise met the requirements of this act.”

§ 33-37-107.
Examinations; fees.

The board shall procure examinations for restricted licenses.

The board shall administer examinations at regular intervals as established by rules.

The board shall set a nonrefundable examination fee for each type of examination pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

.

An applicant failing the examination shall be charged a similar nonrefundable re-examination fee. An applicant is not eligible for re-examination until six (6) months after the failed examination.

The board may accept in lieu of its own examination any certification by other states or professional certifying groups whose requirements are at least as stringent as those set forth by rules adopted in accordance with this act.

Fees collected by the board shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to an account which shall be used by the board to defray costs incurred in the administration of this act.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 206, § 1; 1992, ch. 56, § 2; 2004, ch. 51, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), substituted “procure” for “establish,” and “restricted licenses” for “each class of license”; and, in (b), inserted “regular” following “administer examinations at,” and substituted “as established by rules” for “of not less than six (6) months.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (e) and (f), see § 33-37-101(a)(viii).

§ 33-37-108.
Licenses.

The board shall issue a license to each applicant who meets the requirements of this act and the rules and regulations promulgated by the board.

The board may issue a restricted license to an applicant not qualifying for issuance of a license under this act, but who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board the capability of performing x-ray examinations without endangering the public health and safety. Restricted licenses may be renewed under the provisions of original issuance.

Applicants meeting minimum requirements for a license shall be issued a temporary license to work as a radiologic technologist. The temporary license shall expire fifteen (15) days after the date of the first opportunity for examination.

The board shall issue a special license to an uncertified person to practice as a radiologic technologist if necessary because of regional hardship or emergency condition. The board shall not grant more than one (1) special license to a person. Special licenses shall expire in twelve (12) months.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 206, § 1; 2004, ch. 51, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a), inserted “and the rules and regulations promulgated by the board” at the end.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), and in the first sentence in subsection (b), see § 33-37-101(a)(viii).

§ 33-37-109.
Existing operators.

An applicant who has not met the requirements for a license but who has at least three (3) years experience in the four (4) years before July 1, 1985 and who can demonstrate proficiency shall be issued the appropriate license.

An applicant who is engaged in a course for radiologic technology on July 1, 1985 who completes the course or has completed a twenty-four (24) month course in radiologic technology within two (2) years before July 1, 1985 and can demonstrate proficiency shall be issued a license.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 206, § 1.

§ 33-37-110.
Expiration of license; renewal.

General licenses expire two (2) years from date of issuance. A restricted license expires twelve (12) months from the date of issuance and may be renewed under the provisions of original issuance.

All licenses issued pursuant to this act with the exception of a special license shall be renewed by the board provided that the licensee has conformed with the provisions of this act and submits a renewal fee in an amount established by the board pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

, and provided as follows:

Upon renewal, each person licensed by the board as a radiologic technologist shall provide proof that he has completed twenty-four (24) credit hours of continuing education credit based upon the national standards of the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists;

Upon renewal, each person licensed by the board as a radiologic technician shall provide proof that he has completed six (6) credit hours of continuing education credit based upon the national standards of the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists.

A radiologic technologist who has been licensed in Wyoming, whose license has not been revoked or suspended and who has ceased activities as a radiologic technologist may apply for a license and be evaluated by the board.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 206, § 1; 1992, ch. 56, § 2; 2004, ch. 51, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (b), added the provisions beginning “and provided as follows,” including (b)(i) and (b)(ii); and, in (c), deleted “for not more than eighteen (18) months” following “activities as a radiologic technologist.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in subsection (b), see § 33-37-101(a)(viii).

§ 33-37-111.
Discipline of licensee.

A person licensed pursuant to this act may be censured or placed on probation or may have his license revoked, suspended or restricted, or both, by the board for any of the following causes:

Conviction of a felony or high misdemeanor that relates to the practice of applying ionizing radiation or radiopharmaceutical agents to humans or to the ability to apply ionizing radiation or radiopharmaceutical agents to humans;

For renting or loaning to any person his license to be used as a license for such person;

Violation of the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act;

Violation of any rule promulgated by the board;

Negligent or incompetent use of radiation or radiopharmaceutical agents;

Violation of this act.

All complaints alleging a violation under paragraphs (a)(i) through (vi) of this section shall be in writing, verified by some party familiar with the facts charged and shall be filed with the board. Upon receiving the complaint, the board if it determines the complaint sufficient, shall proceed as in a contested case under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. Upon discipline of any licensee, the board shall notify the appropriate agencies and make other reports as required by law, rules and regulations.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 206, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2004, ch. 51, § 1; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in the introductory language of (a), added provisions for censure, probation, suspension, or revocation; added (a)(vi); rewrote the last sentence in (b) accordingly; and made related changes.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(i), substituted “that relates to the practice of applying ionizing radiation or radiopharmaceutical agents to humans or to the ability to apply ionizing radiation or radiopharmaceutical agents to humans” for “involving moral turpitude” following “misdemeanor.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi) and notes thereto.

Wyoming Controlled Substances Act. —

See §§

35-7-1001

and 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-37-101(a)(viii).

§ 33-37-112.
Competency evaluation.

After receipt of a complaint filed in accordance with W.S.

33-37-111

concerning compliance with this act or the competency of radiologic technicians the board or the radiological health services, health and medical services may evaluate technicians or their job performance and otherwise investigate.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 206, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the department of health and its divisions, see §

9-2-101

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-37-101(a)(viii).

§ 33-37-113.
Violations; penalties.

Any person who applies ionizing radiation or radiopharmaceutical agents to humans without a valid license to do so shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

Any person licensed pursuant to this act who violates the provisions of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 206, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to twice in subsection (b), see § 33-37-101(a)(viii).